Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB698.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 703 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 703 AND 1732-A(A) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 703. Acquisition of Buildings, Sites for School Buildings and Playgrounds, and Disposing Thereof.--In order to comply with the provisions of this act, and subject to the conditions thereof[, the]:<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) The board of school directors of each district is hereby vested with the necessary power and authority to acquire, in the name of the district, by purchase, lease, gift, devise, agreement, condemnation, or otherwise, any and all schools and real estate, either vacant or occupied, including lands theretofore occupied by streets and alleys which have been vacated by municipal authorities, and to acquire by purchase, lease, gift or devise, other buildings approved for school use by the Department of Education as the board of school directors may deem necessary to furnish school buildings or other suitable sites for proper school purposes for said district or to enlarge the grounds of any school property held by such district, and to sell, convey, transfer, dispose of, or abandon the same, or any part thereof, as the board of school directors may determine. Approval of the Department of Education shall not be required for school buildings and playgrounds on any school construction project for which State reimbursement is not requested.(2) The board of school directors of each district may acquire real property by purchase under paragraph (1) for not more than the fair market value. The fair market value of real property for a purchase valued in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be determined by the school directors in consultation with two of the following:(i) The county assessor.(ii) A licensed real estate broker.(iii) A licensed real estate appraiser doing business in the county where the acquisition of property is to be made.(2) THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS OF EACH DISTRICT MAY ACQUIRE REAL PROPERTY BY PURCHASE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) FOR NOT MORE THAN THE APPRAISED VALUE OF THE REAL PROPERTY. IF THE BOARD 20250SB0698PN1622 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS OBTAINS MORE THAN ONE APPRAISAL, THE PRICE PAID BY THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS MAY NOT EXCEED THE AVERAGE OF THE APPRAISALS. THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS SHALL DETERMINE THE APPRAISED VALUE OF THE REAL PROPERTY THROUGH AT LEAST ONE APPRAISAL OF THE REAL PROPERTY BY A PERSON AUTHORIZED TO PERFORM AN APPRAISAL OF THE SUBJECT PROPERTY UNDER THE ACT OF JULY 10, 1990 (P.L.404, NO.98), KNOWN AS THE "REAL ESTATE APPRAISERS CERTIFICATION ACT." A PERSON MAKING AN APPRAISAL UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT INTEREST IN ANY ASPECT OF THE SALE OF THE REAL PROPERTY.(3) Documents related to the determination of fair market THE APPRAISED value under paragraph (2) shall be subject to and accessible under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law," and must be included in the documents made public under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days."RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW."SECTION 1732-A. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO CHARTER SCHOOLS.--(A) CHARTER SCHOOLS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:SECTIONS 108, 110, 111, 321, 325, 326, 327, 431, 436, 443, 510, 518, 527, 703, 708, 736, 737, 738, 739, 740, 741, 752, 753, 755, 771, 776, 777, 808, 809, 810, 1109, 1111, 1112(A), 1301, 1310, 1317, 1317.1, 1317.2, 1318, 1326, 1327, 1327.2, 1329, 1330, 1332, 1333, 1333.1, 1333.2, 1333.3, 1303-A, 1513, 1517, 1518, 1521, 1523, 1531, 1547, 2014-A, ARTICLE XIII-A AND ARTICLE XIV.ACT OF JULY 17, 1961 (P.L.776, NO.341), KNOWN AS THE "PENNSYLVANIA FAIR EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES ACT."ACT OF JULY 19, 1965 (P.L.215, NO.116), ENTITLED "AN ACT 20250SB0698PN1622 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROVIDING FOR THE USE OF EYE PROTECTIVE DEVICES BY PERSONS ENGAGED IN HAZARDOUS ACTIVITIES OR EXPOSED TO KNOWN DANGERS IN SCHOOLS, COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES."SECTION 4 OF THE ACT OF JANUARY 25, 1966 (1965 P.L.1546, NO.541), ENTITLED "AN ACT PROVIDING SCHOLARSHIPS AND PROVIDING FUNDS TO SECURE FEDERAL FUNDS FOR QUALIFIED STUDENTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA WHO NEED FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO ATTEND POSTSECONDARY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER LEARNING, MAKING AN APPROPRIATION, AND PROVIDING FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS ACT."ACT OF JULY 12, 1972 (P.L.765, NO.181), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO DRUGS AND ALCOHOL AND THEIR ABUSE, PROVIDING FOR PROJECTS AND PROGRAMS AND GRANTS TO EDUCATIONAL AGENCIES, OTHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE AGENCIES, INSTITUTIONS OR ORGANIZATIONS."ACT OF DECEMBER 15, 1986 (P.L.1595, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE "ANTIHAZING LAW."* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 1749-A(A)(1) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBPARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 1749-A. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT AND OF OTHER ACTS AND REGULATIONS.(A) GENERAL REQUIREMENTS.--CYBER CHARTER SCHOOLS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE FOLLOWING:* * *(XIII.1) SECTION 703.* * *SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250SB0698PN1622 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728